Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-386
Streets; improvement districts; delineation.

To accomplish any of the purposes stated in section 14-385, the city is authorized in all such proceedings to delineate proposed street improvement districts, proposed mall improvement districts, proposed separate or combined street and sidewalk, or street, or sidewalk, or streets and sidewalks improvement districts which shall embrace therein the street or streets, sidewalk or sidewalks, street or sidewalk, or streets and sidewalks, or part or parts thereof, to be improved as well as the abutting, adjacent, and benefited property proposed to be assessed to cover in whole or in part the cost, including land acquisition expenses if any, of the proposed improvement.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 3, p. 196;

Laws 1969, c. 60, § 2, p. 366.